Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 15 Superior Court Reporters Emeritus

47-15-1.
Creation of the office of superior court reporter emeritus.

There is created the office of superior court reporter emeritus.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 79, § 1.

47-15-2.
Eligibility for appointment as superior court reporter emeritus.

As used in this Code section, the term “year” means all or any portion of a calendar year during which a reporter or court stenographer served as official reporter under appointment by the presiding judge of the circuit.

Any reporter or court stenographer in any superior court judicial circuit who has so served for 40 or more consecutive years in the same circuit shall be eligible for appointment as superior court reporter emeritus and shall be appointed to that office by the judge of the superior court of the circuit, upon application by the reporter or court stenographer.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 79, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 355.

47-15-3.
Salary payable to superior court reporters emeritus.

Each superior court reporter emeritus shall be paid a salary of $200.00 per month, which salary shall be paid on the first day of each month.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 79, § 3.

47-15-4.
Term of office as superior court reporter emeritus; duties; additional compensation for performance of duties.

Each superior court reporter emeritus shall hold such office for life. It shall be his duty to serve as a court reporter whenever the judge of the superior court of his circuit shall call upon him to do so, without additional compensation except for civil cases. For reporting and transcribing civil cases he shall be paid the fee provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 79, § 4.

47-15-5.
Duty of counties to pay salaries of superior court reporters emeritus; duty to levy taxes sufficient to pay such salaries.

The salary provided for in Code Section 47-15-3 shall be paid pro rata out of the general treasuries of the various counties comprising the circuit of the court reporter emeritus, upon the basis of population. Each of the counties comprising such circuit shall pay such part or portion of such salary as its population bears to the total population of all counties of such circuit according to the most recent United States decennial census.

It shall be the duty of the county governing authorities of the various counties comprising the circuit of such court reporter emeritus, when levying taxes for expenses of courts, to levy and make collection of sufficient taxes in their respective counties for the purpose of paying the portion of the salary of the court reporter emeritus chargeable against the respective counties.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 79, §§ 5, 6.